Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 37. Parent-Child Center Program

§ 3701.
Parent-child center program; eligibility.

For purposes of this chapter, “parent-child center” means a community-based organization established for the purpose of providing prevention and early intervention services such as parenting education, support, training, referral, and related services to prospective parents and families with young children including those whose children are medically, socially, or educationally at risk.

The Secretary of Human Services shall:

upon applications made annually, award grants to eligible parent-child centers; and

establish, by rule, a formula for determining the amount of grants awarded under this chapter and minimum eligibility standards for such awards.

In order to be eligible for a grant under this chapter, a parent-child center shall:

Receive some funding from one or more private, local, or federal source. Contributions in kind, whether material, commodities, transportation, or office space, may be used to satisfy the contribution requirement of this subdivision.

Qualify for tax exempt status under the provisions of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Have parent representation on its board of directors.

Represent a designated geographic catchment area.

A parent-child center funded under this chapter shall:

provide leadership in the coordination of services for families with other community service providers;

provide such financial or programmatic information as may be necessary to enable the Secretary of Human Services to evaluate the services provided through grant funds, the effect of such services on consumers of these services, and an accounting of the expenditure of grant funds; and

participate in an annual peer review process conducted by the parent-child center network and the Agency of Human Services.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 326.

§ 3702.
Repealed. 1995, No. 188, § 4.

§ 3703.
Repealed. 2013, No. 142 (Adj. Sess.), § 101.